Colorado statutes. TITLE 32 Special Districts
ARTICLE 22 FRONT RANGE PASSENGER RAIL DISTRICT
32-22-113. Bonds eligible for investment.

All banks, trust companies, savings and loan associations, insurance companies, executors, administrators, guardians, trustees, and other fiduciaries may legally invest any money within their control in any bonds issued pursuant to this article 22. Public entities, as defined in section 24-75-601 (1), may invest public money in the bonds only if the bonds satisfy the investment requirements established in part 6 of article 75 of title 24.

Source:

L. 2021:

Entire article added, (SB 21-238), ch. 401, p. 2672, § 1, effective June 30.

32-22-114. Exemption from taxation - securities laws.

The income or other revenue of the district, all properties at any time owned by the district, any bonds issued by the district, and the transfer of and the income from any bonds issued by the district are exempt from all taxation and assessments in the state. In the resolution or indenture authorizing the bonds, the district may waive the exemption from federal income taxation for interest on the bonds.

Source:

L. 2021:

Entire article added, (SB 21-238), ch. 401, p. 2672, § 1, effective June 30.

32-22-115. No action maintainable.

An action or proceeding at law or in equity to review any acts or proceedings or to question the validity or enjoin the performance of any act or proceedings or the issuance of any bonds or for any other relief against or from any acts or proceedings done under this article 22, whether based upon irregularities or jurisdictional defects, shall not be maintained unless commenced within thirty days after the performance of the act or proceedings or the effective date thereof, whichever occurs first, and is thereafter perpetually barred.

Source:

L. 2021:

Entire article added, (SB 21-238), ch. 401, p. 2672, § 1, effective June 30.

32-22-116. Judicial examination of powers, acts, proceedings, or contracts of the district.

In its discretion, the board may file a petition at any time in the district court in and for any county in which the district is located wholly or in part seeking a judicial examination and determination of any power conferred to the district, any revenue-raising power exercised or that may be exercised by the district, or any act, proceeding, or contract of the district, whether or not the contract has been executed. The judicial examination and determination shall be conducted in substantially the manner set forth in section 32-4-540; except that the notice required shall be published once a week for three consecutive weeks and the hearing shall be held not less than thirty days nor more than forty days after the filing of the petition.

Source:

L. 2021:

Entire article added, (SB 21-238), ch. 401, p. 2672, § 1, effective June 30.

32-22-117. Reporting - auditing.

No later than January 31, 2024, and no later than each January 31 thereafter, the district shall publish and present at a joint meeting of the transportation and local government committee of the House of Representatives and the transportation and energy committee of the Senate, or their successor committees, a comprehensive annual report of its activities for the prior district fiscal year. The district shall also present the report to each metropolitan planning organization and rural transportation planning organization that appoints members to the board pursuant to section 32-22-104 (1)(b)(I).

If the voters of the district approve and the district levies a tax throughout the district as authorized by this article 22, the state auditor shall conduct a comprehensive financial audit of the district once every two years. The district shall pay the state auditor for the costs of each audit.

Source:

L. 2021:

Entire article added, (SB 21-238), ch. 401, p. 2672, § 1, effective June 30.